Kentucky statutes. TITLE LI Unified Juvenile Code
Penalty

620.990.
Penalty.

Except as otherwise provided in this chapter, any person intentionally violating the provisions of this chapter shall be guilty of a Class B misdemeanor.

The use of information by public officers and by defense counsel for purposes of investigation and trial of cases or other proceedings under the provisions of KRS Chapters 600 to 645 or in any criminal prosecution or appeal shall not constitute a violation of this chapter.

History.

Enact. Acts 1986, ch. 423, § 96, effective July 1, 1987; 1988, ch. 350, § 62, effective April 10, 1988; 2008, ch. 72, § 5, effective July 15, 2008.